Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-512
Sale, lease, or transfer; excessive promotion expenditures; action to invalidate; procedure.

Any violation of section 70-510 shall nullify and render wholly void any such proposed purchase, lease or acquisition; Provided, however, any action to set aside and render invalid any such sale, lease, transfer or acquisition, under the provisions of said section, shall be brought, in the district court of the county in which such municipality or public electric light and power district, or a portion thereof, is located, by one or more electors of such municipality or public electric light and power district, or by such municipality or district itself, or by the State of Nebraska, within ninety days after the holding of the election at which the question voted on shall have been submitted.

Initiative Law 1930, No. 324, § 7;

Laws 1931, c. 116, § 7, p. 340;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-607;

R.S.1943, § 70-512.